Utah statutes.
41-6a-216.   Removal of plants or other obstructions impairing view --
Notice to owner -- Penalty.
(1)  The owner of real property shall remove from his property any tree,
plant, shrub, or other obstruction, or part of it that constitutes a traffic
hazard by obstructing the view of an operator of a vehicle on a highway.
(2)  When a highway authority determines on the basis of an engineering and
traffic investigation that a traffic hazard exists, it shall notify the owner
and order that the hazard be removed within 10 days.
(3)  The failure of the owner to remove the traffic hazard within 10 days is a
class C misdemeanor.
